Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-813
Transportation infrastructure; exempt party; duties; commission; powers and duties.

(1) To the extent the exempt party deems practical and compatible with the primary purposes of transportation infrastructure, such exempt party shall:

(a) Consider the impact on endangered or threatened species when designing, constructing, reconstructing, repairing, operating, or maintaining transportation infrastructure. The exempt party may modify or amend designs and operation and maintenance practices to decrease or avoid any negative impact on any endangered or threatened species; and

(b) Restore areas of temporary disturbance on real property it owns in fee simple at the conclusion of any construction, reconstruction, repair, operation, or maintenance.

(2)(a) Upon request of any exempt party, the commission shall provide support and recommendations to such exempt party relating to any potential impact caused by the actions of the exempt party on any endangered or threatened species related to the design, construction, reconstruction, repair, operation, or maintenance of transportation infrastructure.

(b) The exempt party may enter into any written agreement with the commission or any other governmental entity for the purpose of providing aid in the conservation of any endangered or threatened species.

Laws 2024, LB1335, § 7.